Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/qu_EC.dic
adoramuwana//v
adorarina//v
agradicimukuna//v
agradicirikuna//v
akllakrina//v
akllarana//v
anchuchikrina//v
apachinakuna//v
apanakuna//v
apawana//v
armamuna//v
armarimuna//v
asikuna//v
asirichina//v
ayudachiwana//v
ayudana//v
bautizarichinakuna//v
bautizarinakuna//v
bautizariwana//v
brujumuna//v
brujurimuna//v
cambiakuna//v
cambiarichina//v
chakichiwana//v
chakina//v
chakruchinakuna//v
chakrunakuna//v
chakruwana//v
chapamuna//v
chaparimuna//v
chapukuna//v
chapurichina//v
charichiwana//v
charina//v
chaskichinakuna//v
chaskinakuna//v
chaskiwana//v
chayachimukuna//v
chayachirana//v
chayakuna//v
chayarichina//v
chimpachiwana//v
chimpana//v
chimpapumuna//v
chimpapurimuna//v
chimpawana//v
chinkachimukuna//v
chinkachirana//v
chinkakuna//v
chinkarichina//v
chukrichiwana//v
chukrina//v
churachinakuna//v
churanakuna//v
churawana//v
contestamuna//v
contestarimuna//v
convidakuna//v
convidarichina//v
cuidachiwana//v
cuidana//v
divorciachinakuna//v
divorcianakuna//v
divorciawana//v
escribimuna//v
escribirimuna//v
illakuna//v
illarichina//v
intindichiwana//v
intindina//v
ishpachinakuna//v
ishpanakuna//v
ishpawana//v
jampimuna//v
jampirimuna//v
japikuna//v
japirichina//v
jarkachiwana//v
jarkana//v
jatunyana//v
jichumuna//v
jichurimuna//v
juchakuna//v
jucharichina//v
juntachiwana//v
juntana//v
kachachinakuna//v
kachanakuna//v
kachawana//v
kallarichinakuna//v
kallarinakuna//v
kallariwana//v
kalpamuna//v
kalparimuna//v
kamakuna//v
kamarichina//v
kanakuna//v
kariyachikuna//v
kariyamuwana//v
kariyarina//v
karuyamukuna//v
karuyarikuna//v
kasakrina//v
kasarana//v
kasiyachina//v
kasiyanamukuna//v
kasuchikuna//v
kasumuwana//v
kasurina//v
katimukuna//v
katirikuna//v
kauchukrina//v
kauchurana//v
kaupuchina//v
kaupunamukuna//v
kawana//v
kawsamuna//v
kawsarimuna//v
kayakuna//v
kayarichina//v
killanayachiwana//v
killanayarana//v
killkachinakuna//v
killkanakuna//v
killkawana//v
kimimuna//v
kimirimuna//v
kishpichikuna//v
kishpichirichina//v
kishpirichiwana//v
kishpirina//v
krichinakuna//v
krinakuna//v
kriwana//v
kuchuchiwana//v
kuchuna//v
kukuna//v
kumurikuna//v
kumuririchina//v
kunachina//v
kunamuwana//v
kunarina//v
kunkakuna//v
kunkarichina//v
kunkuchiwana//v
kunkuna//v
kurichina//v
kusakrina//v
kusarana//v
kushichikuna//v
kushichina//v
kushikuna//v
kushirichina//v
kutimuna//v
kutirina//v
kuyakuna//v
kuyarichina//v
liyichiwana//v
liyina//v
llakichinakuna//v
llakinakuna//v
llakiwana//v
llankamuna//v
llankarimuna//v
llukchikuna//v
llukchirichina//v
llukshichiwana//v
llukshina//v
llullachinakuna//v
llullanakuna//v
llullawana//v
machamuna//v
macharimuna//v
makakuna//v
makarichina//v
mañachiwana//v
mañana//v
manchachinakuna//v
manchanakuna//v
manchawana//v
mandamuna//v
mandarimuna//v
mapayakuna//v
mapayarichina//v
maskachiwana//v
maskana//v
mayllachinakuna//v
mayllanakuna//v
mayllawana//v
mikumuna//v
mikurimuna//v
millakuna//v
millarichina//v
ministichiwana//v
ministina//v
minkachinakuna//v
minkanakuna//v
minkawana//v
miramuna//v
mirarimuna//v
muchakuna//v
mucharichina//v
munachiwana//v
munana//v
mushukyachinakuna//v
mushukyanakuna//v
mushukyawana//v
muskumuna//v
muskurimuna//v
muyukuna//v
muyurichina//v
nanachiwana//v
nanana//v
nanarikuna//v
nanarina//v
nanawana//v
nimuna//v
nirimuna//v
pagakuna//v
pagarichina//v
pakachiwana//v
pakana//v
paktachinakuna//v
paktanakuna//v
paktawana//v
pallamuna//v
pallarimuna//v
pampakuna//v
pamparichina//v
pantachiwana//v
pantana//v
parlachinakuna//v
parlanakuna//v
parlawana//v
paskamuna//v
paskarimuna//v
pawakuna//v
pawarichina//v
perdonachiwana//v
perdonana//v
pichachinakuna//v
pichanakuna//v
pichawana//v
piñamuna//v
piñarimuna//v
pinkakuna//v
pinkarichina//v
preparachiwana//v
preparana//v
pudichinakuna//v
pudinakuna//v
pudiwana//v
pukllamuna//v
pukllarimuna//v
pukukuna//v
pukurichina//v
puñuchiwana//v
puñuna//v
purichinakuna//v
purinakuna//v
puriwana//v
pushamuna//v
pusharimuna//v
puyakuna//v
puyarichina//v
rantichiwana//v
rantina//v
respetachinakuna//v
respetanakuna//v
respetawana//v
richamuna//v
richarimuna//v
rikchachinakuna//v
rikchakakuna//v
rikchakarichina//v
rikchamuna//v
rikcharimuna//v
riksikrina//v
riksirana//v
rikuchina//v
rikunamukuna//v
rikunayakuna//v
rikunayarichina//v
rikurimuna//v
rimakuna//v
rimarichina//v
rinakuna//v
riwana//v
rukuyamuna//v
rukuyarimuna//v
rupakuna//v
ruparichina//v
rurachiwana//v
rurana//v
sakichinakuna//v
sakinakuna//v
sakiwana//v
samamuna//v
samarimuna//v
semakuna//v
semarichina//v
shamuchiwana//v
shamuna//v
shayachinakuna//v
shayanakuna//v
shayawana//v
shimuna//v
shirimuna//v
shitamukuna//v
shitarikuna//v
shutichimuna//v
shutichirina//v
shuwamukuna//v
shuwarikuna//v
shuyakrina//v
shuyarana//v
sikachina//v
sikanamukuna//v
sinchiyarichikuna//v
sinchiyarimuwana//v
sinchiyaririna//v
sirimukuna//v
siririkuna//v
sirvikrina//v
sirvirana//v
takachina//v
takanamukuna//v
takichikuna//v
takimuwana//v
takirina//v
takllamukuna//v
takllarikuna//v
tamiyakrina//v
tamiyarana//v
tantanakuchina//v
tantanakunamukuna//v
tapuchikuna//v
tapumuwana//v
tapurina//v
tarimukuna//v
taririkuna//v
tarpukrina//v
tarpurana//v
tikrachina//v
tikranamukuna//v
tiyachikuna//v
tiyamuwana//v
tiyarina//v
trabajamukuna//v
trabajarikuna//v
tratakrina//v
tratarana//v
tukuchina//v
tukunamukuna//v
tukyachikuna//v
tukyamuwana//v
tukyarina//v
ukllamukuna//v
ukllarikuna//v
unkukrina//v
unkurana//v
upiyachina//v
upiyanamukuna//v
uriyachikuna//v
uriyamuwana//v
uriyarina//v
urmamukuna//v
urmarikuna//v
ushakrina//v
usharana//v
uyachina//v
uyanamukuna//v
valichikuna//v
valimuwana//v
valirina//v
violamukuna//v
violarikuna//v
visitakrina//v
visitarana//v
wachachina//v
wachanamukuna//v
wakachikuna//v
wakamuwana//v
wakarina//v
waktamukuna//v
waktarikuna//v
wañukrina//v
wañurana//v
warkuchina//v
warkunamukuna//v
waynayachikuna//v
waynayamuwana//v
waynayarina//v
wichamukuna//v
wicharikuna//v
willakrina//v
willarana//v
wiñachina//v
wiñanamukuna//v
yachachikuna//v
yachamuwana//v
yacharina//v
yallimukuna//v
yallirikuna//v
yankakrina//v
yankarana//v
yanuchina//v
yanunamukuna//v
yapuchikuna//v
yapumuwana//v
yapurina//v
yarimukuna//v
yaririkuna//v
yaykukrina//v
yaykurana//v
yuyachina//v
yuyanamukuna//v
